Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 1. Handicrafts.

Sec. 45.65.010.
Identification seals and emblems.

An Alaska Native person who creates or crafts an original article of authentic Alaska Native art in the state may obtain an identification seal as specified in AS

45.65.030(a)

to identify the article. The identification seal may be affixed only to original articles of authentic Alaska Native art created or crafted in the state.

A person may use an emblem described under AS

45.65.030(c)

to identify an article that is made in the state. The emblem may not be used to identify an article made outside the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 40 SLA 1961; am § 1 ch 153 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 125 SLA 1978; am §§ 1, 2 ch 104 SLA 1992; am § 3 ch 16 SLA 2008)

Collateral references. —

74 Am. Jur. 2d Trademarks and Tradenames, § 39.

Sec. 45.65.020.
Administration of chapter.

The commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development is responsible for the administration of the provisions of AS

45.65.010

—

45.65.070

relating to the emblem that is authorized under AS

45.65.010(b)

, including

the supervision of the use of the emblem;

subject to AS

45.65.030(c)

, the design, issuance, and control of emblems;

the issuance of permits to agents to issue permits to use the emblems; and

the enforcement of AS

45.65.010

—

45.65.070

regarding the emblem authorized under AS

45.65.010(b)

.

The Alaska State Council on the Arts (AS

44.27.040

) is responsible for the administration of the provisions of AS

45.65.010

—

45.65.070

relating to identification seals for authentic Alaska Native art, including

subject to AS

45.65.030(a)

, the design, method of affixing, preparation, issuance, and control of identification seals;

the issuance of permits to use identification seals and the collection of the fees established under AS

45.65.040(c)

;

the supervision of the use of identification seals; and

the enforcement of AS

45.65.010

—

45.65.070

regarding identification seals.

History.

(§ 2 ch 40 SLA 1961; am § 1 ch 83 SLA 1977; am § 2 ch 125 SLA 1978; am § 3 ch 104 SLA 1992; am E.O. No. 100, §§ 3, 4 (1998); am § 4 ch 16 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (a) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For silver hand and “made in Alaska” programs, see 3 AAC 58.

Sec. 45.65.030.
Design of identification seals and emblems.

The official symbol for the identification seal is the silver hand symbol. It must bear the words: “Authentic Alaska Native Art from Alaska” and include space for the artist’s name and the place of origin of the article.

[Repealed, § 5 ch 104 SLA 1992.]

The official emblem for an article that is made in the state is a design approved by the commissioner under AS

45.65.020(a)(2)

that depicts a mother bear with a cub and states the words “Made in Alaska.”

History.

(§ 3 ch 40 SLA 1961; am § 2 ch 83 SLA 1977; am § 3 ch 125 SLA 1978; am §§ 4, 5, 11 ch 104 SLA 1992; am E.O. No. 100, § 5 (1998); am § 5 ch 16 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For silver hand and “made in Alaska” programs, see 3 AAC 58.

Sec. 45.65.040.
Identification seal.

The identification seal may only be used after receiving a permit from the council.

[Repealed, § 14 ch 16 SLA 2008.]

The council shall establish forms and fees for the applications and permits to be used or issued under this section, the period for which the permits are valid, and the procedures for renewing the permits.

Before issuing a permit to a person under (a) of this section, the council shall determine that the person is eligible under AS

45.65.010(a)

to obtain the identification seal and that the article for which the person is applying for the permit is eligible under AS

45.65.010(a)

for the identification seal.

A person may report alleged violations of AS

45.65.010

—

45.65.070

regarding identification seals to the council.

History.

(§ 4 ch 40 SLA 1961; am § 2 ch 153 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 83 SLA 1977; am § 4 ch 125 SLA 1978; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1992; am E.O. No. 100, § 6 (1998); am §§ 6 — 8, 14 ch 16 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For silver hand and “made in Alaska” programs, see 3 AAC 58.

Sec. 45.65.045.
Emblem and emblem agent permits.

The emblem authorized under AS

45.65.010(b)

may not be used without receiving a permit from the commissioner or from an agent who possesses a current permit under (b) of this section.

A resident of the state may apply to the commissioner for a permit to act as an agent to issue permits to use the emblem. An agent may report alleged violations of AS

45.65.010

—

45.65.070

regarding emblems to the commissioner.

The commissioner shall establish forms and fees for the applications and permits to be used or issued under this section, the period for which the permits are valid, and the procedures for renewing the permits.

Before issuing a permit for an article under this section, the commissioner or the agent shall determine that the article is eligible for the emblem.

History.

(§ 7 ch 104 SLA 1992; am E.O. No. 100, § 7 (1998))

Administrative Code. —

For silver hand and “made in Alaska” programs, see 3 AAC 58.

Sec. 45.65.050.
Affixing seals to handicraft. [Repealed, § 11 ch 104 SLA 1992.]

Sec. 45.65.055.
Prohibited conduct.

An individual may not

affix or attach the identification seal to an article that is not an original article of authentic Alaska Native art created or crafted in the state;

sell or offer for sale an article that has an identification seal affixed or attached but that is not an original article of authentic Alaska Native art created or crafted in the state; or

alter, change, or counterfeit an identification seal.

History.

(§ 9 ch 16 SLA 2008)

Sec. 45.65.060.
Penalties.

A person who knowingly violates AS

45.65.055

is guilty of a class B misdemeanor. In this subsection, “knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

[Repealed, § 14 ch 16 SLA 2008.]

A person who knowingly or wilfully alters, changes, or counterfeits an emblem is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

A person who knowingly or wilfully sells or offers for sale an article that is not made in the state but that bears the emblem is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

A person who knowingly or wilfully uses the emblem for an article that is not made in the state is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

[Repealed, § 14 ch 16 SLA 2008.]

A person who has been issued a permit under AS

45.65.045

to issue permits to use the emblem, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if the person knowingly or wilfully issues a permit for an article that is not made in the state.

History.

(§ 7a — c ch 40 SLA 1961; am § 4 ch 153 SLA 1962; am § 5 ch 83 SLA 1977; am § 6 ch 125 SLA 1978; am §§ 8, 9 ch 104 SLA 1992; am §§ 10, 11, 14 ch 16 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For penalties for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Administrative Code. —

For silver hand and “made in Alaska” programs, see 3 AAC 58.

Sec. 45.65.070.
Definitions.

In AS

45.65.010

—

45.65.070

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“Alaska Native person” means an individual who is a state resident and who is an enrolled member of an Alaska tribe; in this paragraph, “state resident” means an individual who is physically present in the state with the intent to remain indefinitely in the state under the requirements of AS

01.10.055

, or, if the individual is not physically present in the state, intends to return to the state and remain indefinitely in the state under the requirements of AS

01.10.055

;

“Alaska tribe” means an organized group or community in Alaska that is an Indian tribe; in this paragraph, “Indian tribe” has the meaning given in 25 U.S.C. 450b(e) (Indian Self-Determination and Education Assistance Act);

“authentic Alaska Native art ” means a work of art that is created or crafted in the state by an Alaska Native person;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development;

“council” means the Alaska State Council on the Arts (AS

44.27.040

);

“emblem” means the emblem that is authorized under AS

45.65.010(b)

;

“identification seal” means the seal authorized by AS

45.65.010(a)

;

“original” means new, unique, not a reproduction, and created or crafted by one person without the use of mechanized duplication instruments, electronic duplication instruments, or other devices or systems for copying large numbers of articles, except that “original” includes etched prints, lithographic prints, serigraphic prints, and prints from photographs, if the prints are made by hand by the person who created or crafted the etched plate, etched drawing, etched design, lithographic plate, lithographic stone, silkscreen, or photograph from which the prints were made;

“work of art” means a creation or crafting of

a visual article, including a painting, a sculpture, a drawing, a mosaic, a photograph, an etching, a lithograph, and a serigraph;

calligraphy;

clay, textile, fiber, wood, metal, plastic, or glass, or a combination of these materials;

traditional Alaska Native materials, including ivory, bone, grass, baleen, animal skins, wood, or furs; or

a collage or combination of two or more of the categories identified in (A) — (D) of this paragraph.

History.

(§ 6 ch 40 SLA 1961; am § 6 ch 83 SLA 1977; am § 7 ch 125 SLA 1978; am §§ 10, 11 ch 104 SLA 1992; am E.O. No. 100, § 8 SLA (1998); am §§ 12 — 14 ch 16 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

The definitions in this section were renumbered in 1992, 1998, and 2008 to maintain alphabetical order.

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Secs. 45.65.080 — 45.65.150.
[Renumbered as AS 44.33.501 — 44.33.512.]